AnimYaStem.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +N +Anim +Inanim +Indef +Nom +Acc +Dat +GenLoc +InstrAbl +Voc +Sg +Pl +Indef ^GUESSSTEMA ^GUESSSTEMAA ^GUESSSTEMC

LEXICON Root
AnimYaStem;

LEXICON AnimYaStem
ගැහැණි AnimYaNoun;

LEXICON AnimYaNoun

ි+N+Acc+Sg+Anim:ිය#;
ි+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:ියට #;
ි+N+Acc+Sg+Anim:ියගේ#;
ි+N+Acc+Sg+Anim:ියගෙන්#;
ි+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:ියක් #;
ි+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:ියක#;
ි+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:ියකු #;
ි+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:ියකුට #;
ි+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:ියකුහට #;
ි+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:ියකට #;
ි+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:ියකහට #;
ි+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:ියක්හට #;
ි+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Inanim:ියකුගේ#;
ි+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Inanim:ියක්ගේ#;
ි+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Inanim:ියකගේ#;
ි+N+GenLoc+Sg+Inanim:ියකගෙන්#;
ි+N+GenLoc+Sg+Inanim:ියකුගෙන්#;
ි+N+GenLoc+Sg+Inanim:ියක්ගෙන්#;
ි+N+Acc+Pl+Anim:ු#;
ි+N+Acc+Pl+Anim+Indef:ුන්#;
ි+N+Dat+Pl+Anim+Indef:ුන්ට #;
ි+N+Dat+Pl+Anim+Indef:ුන්හට #;
ි+N+Dat+Pl+Anim+Indef:ුන්හට #;
ි+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Anim+Indef:ුන්ගේ #;
ි+N+GenLoc+Pl+Anim+Indef:ුන්ගෙන් #;
ි+N+Voc+Pl+Anim:ුනි#;
